Hawaii statutes.
§89C-7 Severability. If any provision
of this chapter, or the application thereof to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications
of the chapter which can be given effect without the invalid provision or
application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are severable. [L
1978, c 197, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next